Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 3 Operation and Powers
7-53-313. Purpose.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or any other law to the contrary, this chapter shall be liberally construed to carry out the following purposes and objectives:

The policies and practices of industrial development corporations shall ensure that minority-owned and other disadvantaged businesses share more fully in the American economic system of private enterprise through free and vigorous competition;

Such competition shall be fostered through encouragement and support of minority-owned and other disadvantaged businesses; and

Industrial development corporations aid, counsel and assist in every practical manner minority-owned and other disadvantaged businesses in order to preserve free competition on equal terms with those businesses constituting the major portion of the state's business community.

To assist industrial development corporations in achieving such purposes and objectives, the department of economic and community development and the office of business enterprise, established by § 4-26-101, shall be available to provide technical assistance and consultation.

Acts 1999, ch. 298, § 1.

7-53-314. Preparation and submission of economic impact plan for counties with a metropolitan government and a population exceeding 500,000.

The corporation is authorized to prepare and submit to the governing body of the municipality for approval an economic impact plan in the manner described in this section.

An economic impact plan shall be a written document and shall specifically identify the area to be included in the plan. The area to be included in the plan shall be located in the municipality and shall also include an industrial park within the meaning of § 13-16-102, or a project that is either owned by the corporation or with respect to which the corporation has loaned or will loan funds or has otherwise provided or will provide financial assistance. In addition to the industrial park or project, the area that is the subject of the economic impact plan may also include other properties that the corporation determines will be directly improved or benefited due to the undertaking of the industrial park or project. The economic impact plan shall:

Identify the boundaries of the area subject to the plan;

Identify the industrial park or project located within the area subject to the plan;

Discuss the expected benefits to the municipality from the development of the area subject to the plan, including anticipated tax receipts and jobs created; and

Provide that the property taxes imposed on the property, including the personal property, located within the area subject to the plan will be distributable in the manner described in subsection (c) for a period of time specified in the plan.

Upon the approval of the governing body of the municipality of an economic impact plan with respect to an area, all property taxes levied upon property located within the area by any taxing agency after the effective date of the plan shall be divided as follows:

That portion of the taxes that is equal to the amount of taxes, if any, that were payable with respect to the property for the year prior to the date the economic impact plan was approved, the base tax amount, by the municipality shall be allocated to and, when collected, shall be paid to the respective taxing agencies as taxes levied by the taxing agencies on all other property are paid; provided, that, in any year in which the taxes on any property are less than the base tax amount, there shall be allocated and paid to the respective taxing agencies only those taxes actually imposed; and

Any excess of taxes over the base tax amount shall be allocated to and, when collected, shall be paid into a separate fund of the corporation established to hold the payments until applied for the purposes described in subsection (h).

Notwithstanding subsection (c) to the contrary, an economic impact plan may be approved that allocates an amount greater than the base tax amount to the taxing agencies.

An economic impact plan shall not provide for an allocation of taxes to the corporation for a period in excess of thirty (30) years.

The governing body of a municipality may approve an economic impact plan by resolution, notwithstanding any local charter provision or other provision to the contrary. Prior to approval by the governing body of the municipality, the economic impact plan shall be submitted to the mayor of the municipality. If the area subject to an economic impact plan is located within the corporate limits of a city or town, the taxes that would otherwise be payable to the city, town or county that is not the municipality that created the corporation shall not be paid to the corporation unless the city, town or county has also approved the economic impact plan.

Before the corporation submits an economic impact plan for approval to the governing body of the municipality that created the corporation or to any other city or county, the corporation shall hold a public hearing relating to the proposed plan after publishing a notice of the public hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality at least two (2) weeks prior to the date of the public hearing. The notice shall include the time, place and purpose of the public hearing, and notice of how a map of the area subject to the plan can be viewed by the public.

All taxes allocated to the corporation pursuant to this section shall only be applied by the corporation to pay expenses of the board in furtherance of promoting economic development in the municipality, to pay the cost of projects, or to pay debt service on bonds or other obligations issued by the corporation to pay the cost of the projects. The corporation is authorized to pledge any or all amounts received by the corporation pursuant to this section to the payment of the bonds or other obligations.

After the approval by the governing body of a municipality of an economic impact plan, the clerk or other recording official of the municipality shall transmit to the appropriate assessors of property and to each taxing agency to be affected, a copy of the description of all property within the area subject to the economic impact plan and a copy of the resolution approving that plan. If the plan is approved by any taxing agency other than the municipality, the clerk or other recording official of that taxing agency shall also provide a copy of the resolution approving the plan to the assessors of property and taxing agencies.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, taxes levied upon property within an economic impact area by any taxing agency for the payment of principal of and interest on all bonds, loans, or other indebtedness of the taxing agency, and taxes levied by or for the benefit of this state, shall not be subject to allocation as provided in subsection (c), but may still be levied against the property and, when collected, paid to the taxing agency as taxes levied by the taxing agency on all other property are paid and collected.

This section shall only apply to any county having a metropolitan form of government and having a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

In the event of any conflict between this section and the Uniformity in Tax Increment Financing Act of 2012, compiled in title 9, chapter 23, title 9, chapter 23 shall control.

Acts 2008, ch. 770, § 2; 2008, ch. 971, § 1; 2011, ch. 239, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 605, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 770, § 3 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to all economic impact plans submitted on or after July 1, 2008.

Acts 2008, ch. 971, § 1 provided that the code commission is directed to change all references to “tax assessor”, wherever such references appear, to “assessor of property”, as such sections are amended or volumes are replaced. See §1-1-116.

Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 6 provided that the CRA Act, which is the Community Redevelopment Act of 1998, as amended, being chapter 987 of the Public Acts of 1998, which act has not been codified, is hereby amended to add the following as a new section: “In the event of any conflict between the provisions of this act and title 9, chapter 23, the provisions of title 9, chapter 23 shall control.”

Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 8 provided that the act shall not apply to a plan, or any amendment to such plan, for which required public hearings were conducted prior to March 21, 2012, without the concurrence of the tax increment agency, all affected taxing agencies, and the holders of any indebtedness secured by the tax revenues allocable pursuant to the plan.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

7-53-315. Authority for municipality to aid or provide assistance for certain projects.

Notwithstanding §§7-53-306 and7-53-307, in any municipality in which there has been created a central business improvement district pursuant to chapter 84 of this title, the municipality is authorized to aid or otherwise provide assistance, including without limitation, granting, contributing or pledging to, or for the benefit of the corporation, revenues derived from any source except revenues derived from ad valorem property taxes, for those projects, or portions thereof, that consist of public infrastructure, public improvements or other public facilities, including without limitation, one (1) or more parking or sports facilities, located within an area designated by appropriate resolution or ordinance by the municipality as the center city area, for such term or terms and upon such conditions as may be determined by the governing body of the municipality.

Acts 2010, ch. 800, § 2.

7-53-316. Redevelopment of brownfield sites in economically disadvantaged areas.

It is the intent of the general assembly to encourage the redevelopment of brownfield sites in economically disadvantaged areas within this state. In addition to the authorization provided in § 7-53-312, a corporation located in a municipality in which an urban brownfield redevelopment project is located is also authorized to prepare and submit to the municipality for approval an economic impact plan with respect to an urban brownfield redevelopment project in the manner provided in this section. Except to the extent modified under this section, § 7-53-312 shall apply to an economic impact plan for an urban brownfield redevelopment project.

An economic impact plan submitted for approval under this section shall provide that the property taxes imposed on the property, including the personal property located within the area subject to the plan, the sales taxes imposed upon sales within the area subject to the plan, the sales taxes imposed upon construction and related development or redevelopment activity in the area subject to the plan, or any combination and amount of such property and sales taxes, will be distributable in the manner described in subsection (c) and § 7-53-312(c), as applicable, and used for the purposes permitted by subsection (e).

In addition to the allocation of property taxes provided in § 7-53-312, an economic impact plan may further provide that the non-school portion of the local sales tax increment shall be allocated to and, when received, shall be paid into a separate fund of the corporation established to hold such payments, along with any other amounts received by the corporation pursuant to this section or § 7-53-312, until applied for the purposes described in subsection (e) pursuant to the economic impact plan. In calculating the non-school portion of the local sales tax increment, the plan may also include any new local sales taxes received from construction or related redevelopment activity occurring within the area subject to the plan. Upon the approval by a municipality of an economic impact plan containing all or any portion of the permitted excess local sales taxes, the local sales taxes received by the municipality shall be divided and allocated as so provided.

Notwithstanding § 7-53-312 to the contrary, the corporation may prepare, and the municipality may approve, an economic impact plan that allocates an amount greater than the base tax amount and the base sales tax amount to the taxing agencies.

All sales and property taxes allocated for an economic impact plan approved pursuant to this section shall only be applied by the corporation to pay expenses of the corporation in furtherance of economic development in the municipality, to pay or reimburse qualified costs or to pay debt service on bonds or other obligations issued by the corporation to finance any of the foregoing. The corporation shall cease to receive allocations described in this section and § 7-53-312(c) upon the maturity of the original bond or obligation used to finance the project, whose maximum amount of debt maturity must be no longer than thirty (30) years.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Base sales tax amount” means the revenues received by the municipality from local sales taxes, excluding that portion of the local sales tax dedicated for school purposes, from the area subject to the plan for the fiscal year of the municipality immediately prior to the year in which the plan is adopted. “Local sales taxes” means taxes received by the municipality pursuant to the 1963 Local Option Revenue Act, compiled in title 67, chapter 6, part 7, excluding that portion of the local sales taxes dedicated for school purposes;

“Brownfield site” means a parcel or adjacent or related parcels of real property that is currently, or at any time since January 1, 2000, has been the subject of an investigation or remediation as a brownfield project under a voluntary agreement or consent order pursuant to § 68-212-224;

“Non-school portion of the local sales tax increment” means any excess of local sales taxes, after deducting the portion that is statutorily designated for school purposes, over the base sales tax amount that is received by each municipality that has approved the economic impact plan from the specified sales and development activity in the area that is subject to the plan;

“Qualified costs” include:

Costs for all roads, streets, sidewalks, access ways, ramps, bridges, landscaping, signage, utility facilities, grading, drainage, parks, plazas, greenways, public parking facilities, public recreational facilities, public educational facilities, public meeting facilities, and similar improvements that are necessary for or otherwise useful for the urban redevelopment project or for the redevelopment of the area subject to the economic impact plan;

All administrative, architectural, legal, engineering, and other expenses as may be necessary or incidental to the development and implementation of the economic impact plan or the financing of expenses under this section; and

Costs that are directly related to the investigation, remediation, or mitigation of a brownfield project located in an urban redevelopment project as required by a voluntary agreement or consent order pursuant to § 68-212-224;

“Qualified opportunity zone” means census tracts identified as qualified opportunity zones as certified under the federal Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 (Public Law 115-97);

“Redevelopment zone” means:

An area in this state designated as of January 1, 2009, as a renewal community by the federal department of housing and urban development;

An area in this state designated as of January 1, 2009, as a low-income community for purposes of the federal new markets tax credits program; or

A qualified opportunity zone in this state;

“Urban brownfield redevelopment project”:

Means the development or redevelopment, in one (1) or more phases as specified in the economic impact plan, of all or any portion of a parcel or parcels of contiguous, adjacent, or related properties. The parcel or parcels must be located in a redevelopment zone and must contain:

At least one (1) brownfield site; or

Contain a site of at least ten (10) acres that has remained vacant or substantially unoccupied for at least five (5) years and, at any time within twenty (20) years prior to June 1, 2011, included manufacturing, industrial, distribution, or retail facilities, in total, containing at least one million square feet (1,000,000 sq. ft.); and

Includes any project as defined in § 7-53-101 and any publicly or privately owned or operated retail, commercial, industrial, or mixed-use facility, including a visitor center, recreation, or entertainment facility and all related hotels, convention center facilities, administrative facilities, offices, restaurants, and other amenities constructed or acquired as part of the project.

An urban brownfield redevelopment project shall be a project for purposes of § 7-53-101 and for all other purposes under this chapter.

Acts 2011, ch. 384, § 1; 2019, ch. 257, §§ 1-7.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (a), deleted “large” following “redevelopment of” and substituted “this state” for “large and mid-size counties within the state” in the first sentence; added the last sentence in (e); and, in (f), deleted “containing at least five (5) acres” following “real property” in the definition of “brownfield site”; rewrote the definitions of “qualified costs”, “redevelopment zone” and “urban brownfield redevelopment project” which read: “‘Qualified costs’ include costs for all roads, streets, sidewalks, access ways, ramps, bridges, landscaping, signage, utility facilities, grading, drainage, parks, plazas, greenways, public parking facilities, public recreational facilities, public educational facilities, public meeting facilities and similar improvements that are necessary for or otherwise useful for the urban redevelopment project or for the redevelopment of the area subject to the economic impact plan. “Qualified redevelopment costs” shall also include all administrative, architectural, legal and engineering expenses and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the development and implementation of the economic impact plan or the financing of expenses under this section;“‘Redevelopment zone’ means either an area designated as of January 1, 2009, as a renewal community by the federal department of housing and urban development or an area designated as of January 1, 2009, as a low income community for purposes of the federal new markets tax credits program. A redevelopment zone must also be located in a county having a population of eighty thousand (80,000) or more according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;“‘Urban brownfield redevelopment project’ means the development or redevelopment, in one (1) or more phases as specified in the economic impact plan, of all or any portion of a parcel or parcels of contiguous, adjacent or related properties totaling at least one hundred (100) acres. The parcel or parcels must be located in a redevelopment zone and must either contain at least one (1) brownfield site or contain a site of at least ten (10) acres that has remained vacant or substantially unoccupied for at least five (5) years and, at any time within twenty (20) years prior to June 1, 2011, included a manufacturing, industrial, distribution or retail facility containing at least one million square feet (1,000,000 sq. ft.). An urban brownfield redevelopment project may include any project as defined in §7-53-101 and may further include any publicly or privately owned or operated retail, commercial, industrial or mixed use facility, including a visitor center, recreation or entertainment facility and all related hotels, convention center facilities, administrative facilities, offices, restaurants and other amenities constructed or acquired as part of the project.”; and added the definition of “qualified opportunity zone”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 257, § 8. April 30, 2019.

7-53-317. Parcels of property located on remediation site.

As used in this section:

“Local government” means any home rule municipality; and

“Remediation site” means a site containing at least one thousand three hundred (1,300) acres that have been held by the United States department of energy due to an extended period of environmental remediation and conveyed by the United States department of energy to a nonprofit entity that is recognized as tax exempt by the internal revenue service and engaged in economic development.

Upon receiving all authorizations required by this chapter, on or after July 1, 2017, any and all parcels of property located on a remediation site in a local government may be transferred to the industrial development board of the local government consistent with the terms of the conveyance. The industrial development board is authorized to sell, lease, dispose of, or contract for the operation of the property in furtherance of the public purpose of promoting economic development in that area.

Upon transfer of the parcels to the industrial development board as provided in subsection (b), a lawful management or lease agreement shall be executed between the industrial development board and the nonprofit entity described in subdivision (a)(2), in which the United States department of energy's intent is clearly memorialized, including a provision that the nonprofit entity shall manage the remediation site and shall market the parcels to potential buyers in order to provide substantial sources of tax revenue or economic activity to the local government and to induce private enterprises to locate or remain in the area.

Acts 2017, ch. 219, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 219, § 2. April 28, 2017.